Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
LICENSE PLATES

42-3-201. Number plates furnished - style - periodic reissuance - tabs - rules.

The department shall issue to every owner whose vehicle is registered two number plates; except that the department shall issue one number plate for the following:
(1) (a) (I) The department shall issue to every owner whose vehicle is registered two number plates; except that the department shall issue one number plate for the following:

A motorcycle;

A street rod vehicle;

A trailer or semitrailer;

A vehicle drawn by a motor vehicle; or

An item of special mobile machinery.

Repealed.

At the discretion of the executive director of the department, the department may issue one number plate for any vehicle not listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a).

The department may require the return to the department of all number plates upon termination of the lawful use of such plates by the owner.

The department may issue the number plates required in this section for one or more registration periods. If the number plates are issued for multi-year use, the department may issue a validating tab or sticker to indicate the year of registration of the vehicle.

Any validating tab or sticker that evidences the receipt of taxes under this article may be obtained by the department through normal purchasing procedures and may be produced and issued by the department through its authorized agents. Such validation tab or sticker shall be produced in accordance with the minimum specifications of the department, and such specifications shall reflect, at a minimum, the same quality control standards employed by the department of corrections in the production of such validation tab or sticker as those standards existed on January 1, 1999.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the owner shall display on every number plate the registration number assigned to the vehicle and owner, the year number for which it is issued, the month in which it expires, and any other appropriate symbol, word, or words designated by the department. The department may adopt rules for the issuance of permanent number plates that do not display the year number for which it is issued or the month in which it expires. Such plate and the required letters and numerals, except the year number for which issued, must be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from a distance of one hundred feet during daylight.

The department shall issue for every passenger motor vehicle, rented without a driver, the same type of number plates as the type of plates issued for private passenger vehicles.

The department shall issue, for every noncommercial or recreational vehicle registered as such pursuant to this article, numbered plates or other insignia of a color or design different from any other Colorado plates, to be determined by the department, in order that such numbered plates or other insignia may be plainly recognized at a distance of at least one hundred feet during daylight.

A new or replacement license plate issued by the department shall, to the extent that it is practical, have standardized coloring and identifying characters limited to no more than a total of six numbers and letters; except that such character limitation does not apply to personalized license plates issued under section 42-3-211.

The department of revenue may require the replacement of any license plate as necessary to ensure that license plates are legible as required by section 42-3-202 (2).

The department shall promulgate rules that require the destruction, recycling, or other permanent disposal of license plates that are no longer used to evidence registration of a motor vehicle and are voluntarily given to the department, an authorized agent, or a person who receives license plates in the ordinary course of business.

The department, an authorized agent, or a person who receives license plates in the ordinary course of business shall destroy, recycle, or dispose of a license plate in accordance with rules promulgated by the department under this subsection (6).

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department shall issue license plates to a Class A commercial trailer or semitrailer registered in Colorado that do not contain the month and year the trailer expires, and a validating sticker or tab is not issued nor required for the license plates.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1106, § 2, effective August 8; (5)(b) amended, p. 253, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(6) added, p. 321, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a)(I)(E) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1491, § 9, effective October 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended and (7) added, (HB 12-1038), ch. 276, p. 1456, § 5, effective June 8.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(I)(D) and (1)(a)(I)(E) amended and (1)(a)(I)(F) added, (HB 14-1367), ch. 303, p. 1286, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(I)(D) and (1)(a)(I)(E) amended and (1)(a)(I)(F) repealed, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 229, § 3, effective March 23.

42-3-202. Number plates furnished to be attached.

The owner shall attach the number plates assigned to a self-propelled vehicle, other than a motorcycle or street rod vehicle, to the vehicle with one in the front and the other in the rear. The owner shall attach the number plate assigned to a motorcycle, street rod vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, other vehicle drawn by a motor vehicle, or special mobile machinery to the rear of the vehicle. The owner shall display number plates during the current registration year, except as otherwise provided in this article 3.

If the department issues a validating tab or sticker to a motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-3-201, the current month validating tab or sticker shall be displayed in the bottom left corner of the rear license plate. The current year validating tab or sticker shall be displayed in the bottom right corner of the rear license plate. The tabs or stickers shall be visible at all times.

The owner or driver of a motor vehicle shall securely fasten the license plate to the vehicle to which it is assigned so as to prevent the plate from swinging.
(2) (a) (I) The owner or driver of a motor vehicle shall securely fasten the license plate to the vehicle to which it is assigned so as to prevent the plate from swinging.

Except when authorized by this article 3 or rule of the department, the rear license plate must be:

Horizontal at a height not less than twelve inches from the ground, measuring from the bottom of the plate;

In a place and position to be clearly visible;

Maintained free from foreign materials and clearly legible;

At the approximate center of the vehicle measured horizontally; and

Mounted on or within eighteen inches of the rear bumper.

Except when authorized by this article 3, the front license plate must be:

Displayed horizontally on the front of a motor vehicle in the location designated by the motor vehicle manufacturer;

Maintained free from foreign materials; and

Clearly legible.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle with an affixed device or a substance that causes all or a portion of a license plate to be unreadable by a system used to automatically identify a motor vehicle. Such a device includes, without limitation, a cover that distorts angular visibility; alters the color of the plate; or is smoked, tinted, scratched, or dirty so as to impair the legibility of the license plate.

A person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

A person who violates paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction and shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section, the owner of a military vehicle may elect to not display the vehicle's assigned license plate if the license plate is physically in the military vehicle and is available for inspection to any peace officer who requests the plate.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1108, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 321, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4) added, (SB 10-075), ch. 169, p. 597, § 2, effective August 11; (1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1491, § 10, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1367), ch. 303, p. 1286, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 15-090), ch. 334, p. 1360, § 2, see subsection (2) of the editor's note following this section.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 229, § 4, effective March 23.

L. 2018:

(2)(a)(II) and (2)(a)(III) amended, (SB 18-028), ch. 85, p. 685, § 1, effective March 29.

42-3-203. Standardized plates - notice of funding through gifts, grants, and donations - rules - repeal.

Unless otherwise authorized by statute, the department shall issue all Class C vehicles a single type of standardized license plate. Unless otherwise authorized by statute, the department shall issue all Class B vehicles, except recreational trucks, a single type of standardized license plate.

Repealed.

An owner who has applied for renewal of registration of a vehicle but who has not received the number plates or plate for the ensuing registration period may operate or permit the operation of such vehicle upon the highways, upon displaying the number plates or plate issued for the preceding registration period, for such time as determined by the department as it may find necessary for issuance of such new plates.

The department may issue individual temporary registration number plates and certificates good for a period not to exceed sixty days upon application by an owner of a motor vehicle or the owner's agent and the payment of a registration fee of two dollars, one dollar and sixty cents to be retained by the authorized agent or department issuing the plates and certificates and the remainder to be remitted monthly to the department to be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the highway users tax fund.
(3) (a) (I) The department may issue individual temporary registration number plates and certificates good for a period not to exceed sixty days upon application by an owner of a motor vehicle or the owner's agent and the payment of a registration fee of two dollars, one dollar and sixty cents to be retained by the authorized agent or department issuing the plates and certificates and the remainder to be remitted monthly to the department to be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the highway users tax fund.

The authorized agent may issue individual temporary registration number plates and certificates good for a period not to exceed sixty days upon application by an owner of special mobile machinery or the owner's agent and the payment of a registration fee of two dollars, one dollar and sixty cents to be retained by the authorized agent or department issuing the plates and certificates and the remainder to be remitted monthly to the department to be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the highway users tax fund.

It is unlawful for a person to use a number plate and certificate after it expires. A person who violates any provision of this paragraph (a) commits a class B traffic infraction.

The department may issue to licensed motor vehicle dealers temporary registration number plates and certificates in blocks of twenty-five upon payment of a fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents for each block of twenty-five. The department shall transmit any money it receives from this sale to the state treasurer for credit to the highway users tax fund and allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S. The department may promulgate rules creating a system for the dealer to:

Print on the temporary plates the temporary registration number, vehicle identification number, and other information required by the department; and

Print temporary registration certificates with the information required by the department.

Subject to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c), the department shall not issue more than two temporary registration number plates and certificates per year to a Class A or Class B motor vehicle.

Beginning July 1, 2008, the department shall track by vehicle identification number the number of temporary registration number plates and certificates issued to a motor vehicle.

The department may promulgate rules authorizing the issuance of more than two temporary registration number plates and certificates per year if the motor vehicle title work or lien perfection has caused the need for such issuance.

By July 1, 2016, the department shall make temporary registration number plates or certificates so that each complies with the requirements of section 42-3-202, including being fastened, visible, and readable; except that a temporary plate is affixed only to the rear of the vehicle. The department shall implement an electronic issuance system for temporary license plates. The department may promulgate rules to implement this system.

and (III) Repealed.

A dealer may issue a second temporary registration number plate in accordance with this subsection (3) if the dealer:

Has issued a temporary plate to the owner when selling the motor vehicle to the owner;

Has not delivered or facilitated the delivery of the certificate of title to the purchaser or the holder of a chattel mortgage as required in section 42-6-112 or 42-6-119 (3) within sixty days after the motor vehicle was purchased; and

Has taken every reasonable action necessary to deliver or facilitate the delivery of the certificate of title.

All or part of the face of the license plates furnished pursuant to this section shall be coated with a reflective material.

Source:

L. 2005:

(3)(b) amended, p. 145, § 20, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1108, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(3)(c) added, p. 1597, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1493, § 16, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1367), ch. 303, p. 1286, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(3) amended, (SB 15-090), ch. 334, p. 1358, § 1, see subsection (3) of the editor's note following this section.

L. 2016:

(3)(e) added, (SB 16-140), ch. 287, p. 1169, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) repealed, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 230, § 5, effective March 23; (3)(d)(II) repealed, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 368, § 16, effective August 9.

42-3-204. Reserved parking for persons with disabilities - applicability - definitions - rules.

Definitions. As used in this section:

"Disability" or "disabled" means a physical impairment that meets the standards of 23 CFR 1235.

"Extended" means a condition that is not expected to change within thirty months after the issuance of an identifying figure, given the current state of medical or adaptive technology.

"Holder" means a person with a disability who has lawfully obtained an identifying plate or placard.

"Identification number" means the number on a Colorado driver's license, a Colorado identification document, or an identification document issued by the United States.

"Identifying figure" means a figure that provides notice that a person is authorized to use a reserved parking space.

"Identifying placard" means a placard bearing an identifying figure issued under this section or a similar provision in another state and refers to a ninety-day, three-year, or permanent placard.

"Identifying plate" means a license plate bearing an identifying figure issued under this section or a similar provision in another state and refers to either a three-year or permanent license plate.

"Permanent" means a condition that is not expected to change within a person's lifetime, given the current state of medical or adaptive technology.

"Professional" means a physician licensed to practice medicine or practicing medicine under section 12-240-107 (3)(i), a physician assistant licensed under section 12-240-113, a podiatrist licensed under article 290 of title 12, an advanced practice nurse registered under section 12-255-111, or a physician, physician assistant, podiatrist, or advanced practice nurse authorized to practice professionally by another state that shares a common border with Colorado. For the purposes of issuance of a ninety-day placard only, "professional" includes a chiropractor or physical therapist.

"Remuneration-exempt identifying placard" means an identifying placard issued under this section that exempts the holder from paying remuneration at parking devices.

"Remuneration-exempt qualifying disability" means a disability that limits an individual's:

Fine motor control in both hands;

Ability to reach a height of forty-eight inches from the ground due to lack of strength or mobility in the individual's finger, hand, or upper extremity; or

Ability to reach or access a parking meter due to the use of a wheelchair or other ambulatory device.

"Reserved parking" means a parking space reserved for a person with a disability as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

"Temporary" means a condition that is expected to last less than thirty months after the issuance of an identifying plate or placard, given the current state of medical or adaptive technology.

Administration by the department.

Records. The department shall maintain in its records for at least three years:

The registration information used to issue an identifying plate or placard;

Any violations of section 42-4-1208 by the holder of an identifying plate or placard; and

The application for an identifying plate or placard or an electronic or digital reproduction of the application.

Peace officers may access records. Upon the moneys being available and appropriated from the disabled parking education and enforcement fund created in section 42-1-226, the department shall provide immediate electronic access to the records under this subsection (2) to a peace officer working within the course and scope of the officer's official duties.

Records confidential. Identifying information about the person with the disability for whom an identifying plate or placard is issued is strictly confidential and only available to:

A peace officer, parking authority, or tolling authority acting within the course and scope of the official's duties; or

Personnel within the department for official business related to the identifying plate or placard.

Department to establish forms - rules. The department shall promulgate a rule creating an application and renewal form that:

Is signed by a professional, under penalty of perjury, to affirm that an applicant meets the eligibility requirements for an identifying plate or placard and setting out the penalties for authorizing an identifying plate or placard when an applicant is ineligible or before verifying that a person has a disability; and

Contains a notice of the eligibility requirements to obtain an identifying plate or placard.

Types of plates or placards.

Authorization. The department may issue the following registration type for issuing disabled plates and placards that notify the public that the vehicle transports a person who may use reserved parking:

A ninety-day identifying placard;

A three-year identifying placard;

(II.5) A three-year remuneration-exempt identifying placard;

A permanent identifying placard;

A three-year identifying plate;

A permanent identifying plate;

A military license plate, issued under section 42-3-213 or 42-3-218 (3), with an additional identifying figure to indicate that the owner of the vehicle is authorized to make use of reserved parking for persons with disabilities.

Number of placards and license plates allowed. (I) (A) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b)(I)(B) of this section, the department may issue two identifying placards, two identifying plates, or one plate and one placard to an eligible individual.

(B) The department may issue one remuneration-exempt identifying placard to an eligible individual.

(II) The department may issue two military license plates under section 42-3-213 or 42-3-218 (3) with identifying figures or one military license plate under section 42-3-213 or 42-3-218 (3) with an additional identifying figure and one placard to a qualified individual.

(III) The department may issue one identifying plate or placard to each parent or guardian of a child with a disability who is under sixteen years of age, but the department shall not issue more than two identifying placards, two identifying plates, or one plate and one placard for the child. This subsection (3)(b)(III) does not apply to a remuneration-exempt identifying placard.

Cost. The cost for issuance of an identifying plate is the same as for a standard plate. There is no fee for an identifying placard.

Issuance of plate or placard - rules.

Department to issue. The department shall issue an identifying plate or placard to an applicant that pays any required fees and is qualified for the plate or placard under paragraph (h) of this subsection (5).

Identification number on placard. The department shall place the last four digits of the holder's identification number on the face of an identifying placard. If an entity that transports persons with disabilities obtains a placard, the placard shall bear the true name of the entity providing the service rather than the identification number.

Expiration date on placard. The department shall place the expiration date on an identifying placard using a date system that removes a portion of the placard to indicate the expiration date. The department shall affix to an identifying placard a validating sticker indicating the expiration date.

Department to give notice of rights and responsibilities. When a person files an application for issuance or renewal of an identifying plate or placard under this section, the department shall provide to the applicant an informational pamphlet or other informational source, developed by the department, that describes reserved parking and the rights and responsibilities of the holders of identifying plates or placards. The department shall develop the pamphlet or other informational source.

Personalized and other specialty plates authorized. An applicant may apply for a personalized identifying plate. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of identifying plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized identifying plates under this paragraph (e) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of personalized plates. The fees under this paragraph (e) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized identifying plates.

Trusts may use. A person may use an identifying plate or placard on a motor vehicle that is owned by a trust created for the benefit of and in the name of a person who is eligible for reserved parking.

Placards issued by other states. An identifying placard issued in another state or country is not valid for more than ninety days after the holder becomes a resident of Colorado. A person must surrender any currently held identifying placard issued in another state or country to be issued an identifying placard in Colorado.

Requirements for issuance of identifying placards or plates. (I) To qualify for an identifying placard or plate, an individual must submit:

A written statement, made by a professional on a form published by the department, that the person has a physical impairment meeting the standards of 23 CFR 1235 and that the impairment is expected to be temporary, last thirty months, or be permanent, as the case may be;

A signed affidavit affirming: Knowledge of the eligibility requirements; that the person to whom the placard or plate is issued is and remains eligible to use the placard or plate; and knowledge of the penalties for obtaining a plate or placard when ineligible; and

A Colorado driver's license or identification document, or an identification document issued by the United States government, for the person who is entitled to use reserved parking.

(I.5) To qualify for a remuneration-exempt identifying placard, an individual must submit:

(A) A written statement, made by a professional on a form published by the department, that the individual has a remuneration-exempt qualifying disability;

(B) A signed affidavit affirming: Knowledge of the eligibility requirements; that the individual to whom the placard is issued is and remains eligible to use the placard; and knowledge of the penalties for obtaining a placard when ineligible; and

(C) A Colorado driver's license or identification document, or an identification document issued by the United States government, for the individual who is entitled to use a remuneration-exempt identifying placard.

(II) To qualify for a ninety-day identifying placard, a resident of another state who becomes disabled while in this state must submit a driver's license or identification document issued by the state of residence or the United States government along with the documents required by sub-subparagraphs (A) and (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (h).

(III) A placard issued for a person under sixteen years of age may bear the parent's or guardian's identification number in lieu of the holder's number. If the placard bears the last four digits of a parent's or guardian's identification number, the department shall also place the letter "C" as a designator on the placard.

(IV) A state agency or business entity that transports persons with disabilities may obtain a permanent identifying plate or placard for reserved parking. To qualify for a three-year or permanent identifying plate or placard, the agency or business entity must:

(A) Show that it transports persons with disabilities;

(B) Provide a driver's license or identification document of its chief operations officer within Colorado;

(C) Provide its employee identification number; and

Provide any other information required by the department by rule.

Requirements for identifying figure on military license plate. To qualify for a military license plate with an identifying figure, the applicant must qualify for a permanent identifying plate under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of this subsection (5) and meet the eligibility criteria in section 42-3-213 or 42-3-218 (3) for a military license plate. A military license plate with an identifying figure expires in accordance with the schedule established by the department for periodic registration under section 42-3-102 (1)(a).

Expiration and renewal.

Ninety-day placards. A ninety-day identifying placard expires on the last day of the month in which the ninetieth day after issuance occurs. The holder may apply for or renew the placard by meeting the requirements of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the placard.

Three-year placards. A three-year identifying placard expires on the last day of the thirty-sixth full month after the date of issuance or renewal. The holder may apply for or renew the placard by meeting the requirements of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the placard.

Permanent placards. (I) A permanent identifying placard expires on the last day of the thirty-sixth full month after the date of issuance or renewal. The holder may renew the placard by submitting:

(A) A written statement required by sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the placard by mail or a Colorado driver's license, a Colorado identification document, or an identification document issued by the United States in person in the office of the department;

(B) An affidavit, made under penalty of perjury, that the person to whom the placard is issued remains eligible to use the placard;

(C) The date of birth and Colorado driver's license or identification card number of the person who may use reserved parking; and

(D) Every third renewal, a written statement required by sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the placard.

(II) If the holder is an entity, the holder may renew the placard upon resubmitting and updating the information necessary to be issued the placard under subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section.

Three-year identifying plates. (I) A three-year identifying plate expires in accordance with the schedule established by the department for periodic registration under section 42-3-102 (1)(a). Eligibility for a three-year identifying plate expires on the last day of the thirty-sixth full month after the date of issuance or renewal. The holder may renew the plate by meeting the requirements of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the plate.

(II) If a three-year identifying plate is issued for a person under sixteen years of age using a parent's or guardian's identification document, the department shall place a "C" on the registration card issued under section 42-3-113 (2).

Permanent identifying plates. (I) A permanent identifying plate or military license plate with an identifying figure expires in accordance with the schedule established by the department for periodic registration under section 42-3-102 (1)(a). Eligibility for a permanent identifying plate or identifying figure for a military license plate expires on the last day of the thirty-sixth full month after the date of issuance or renewal. The holder may renew the plate by submitting:

(A) A current verification form as required by sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section by mail or a Colorado driver's license, Colorado identification document, or identification document issued by the United States in person in the office of an authorized agent;

(B) An affidavit, made under penalty of perjury, that the person to whom the plate is issued remains eligible to use the plate;

(C) The date of birth and Colorado driver's license or identification card number of the person who may use reserved parking; and

(D) Every third renewal, a written statement required by sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section to qualify for the plate.

(II) If the plate is issued for a person under sixteen years of age using a parent's or guardian's identification document, the department shall place a "C" on the registration card issued under section 42-3-113 (2).

(III) If the holder is an entity, the holder may renew the plate upon resubmitting and updating the information necessary to be issued the plate under subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (h) of subsection (5) of this section.

Placards issued before January 1, 2005. Any identifying placard issued before January 1, 2005, expires on July 1, 2014.

Violations - department may revoke.

Upon receipt of a sworn statement from a peace officer or an authorized parking enforcement official that a person has improperly used reserved parking in violation of section 42-4-1208, an identifying plate or placard may be revoked by the department. To be accepted by the department, the peace officer or authorized parking enforcement official must include with the statement the name of the person who misused the identifying plate or placard and either the identifying plate or placard number or the last four digits of the driver's license or identification document number printed on the placard.

The revocation is effective forty-five days after the department receives the sworn statement unless a hearing is requested in accordance with paragraph (e) of this subsection (7).

Upon receipt of a notice that the holder of an identifying plate or placard was convicted of, or pled nolo contendere to, a violation of section 42-4-1208, the department shall revoke each identifying placard or plate held by the person.

Revocation period. (I) Upon a first violation of section 42-4-1208, the department shall deny reissuance of the identifying plate or placard for twelve months after the date of revocation.

(II) Upon a second or subsequent violation of section 42-4-1208, the department shall deny reissuance of the identifying plate or placard for a period of at least five years after the date of the second or most recent subsequent revocation.

Written notice of revocation. The department shall notify in writing the person issued the identifying plate or placard of the revocation. The department shall include in the notice:

A demand for the return of the identifying plate or placard;

A warning that continued use of the identifying plate or placard by any person is subject to the penalty set forth in section 42-4-1701; and

A statement that the person may appeal the revocation by filing a written request with the department within thirty days after the department issued the notice.

Request for hearing. If a person requests a hearing on the revocation of an identifying plate or placard within thirty days after the department issued the notice, the department shall hold a hearing before revoking the plate or placard. If a hearing is held and the hearing officer upholds the revocation, the revocation takes effect immediately.

Penalties. (I) A person who fails to return a revoked identifying placard or plate commits a class B traffic infraction.

(II) A person who attempts to obtain an identifying plate or placard when under revocation in accordance with this subsection (7) is subject to the penalties in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(VIII).

Source:

L. 2005:

(2)(e) amended, p. 145, § 18, effective April 5; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1109, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1321, § 5, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(e) repealed, p. 195, § 1, effective August 5; (1)(b)(II), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3) amended, p. 136, § 29, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2125, § 185, effective August 11; entire section amended, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1918, § 2, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2011:

(1)(g) amended, (SB 11-195), ch. 195, p. 758, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2013:

(1)(f), (2)(a)(I)(C), (2)(a)(II)(F), and (3)(a) amended and (1)(i) and (2)(a)(II)(F.5) added, (SB 13-058), ch. 136, p. 446, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2014:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 14-1029), ch. 252, p. 990, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(3)(a)(VI), (3)(b)(II), (5)(i), and IP(6)(e)(I) amended, (HB 15-1026), ch. 231, pp. 859, 860, §§ 1, 3, effective August 5; (3)(b)(II) amended, (HB 15-1136), ch. 158, p. 471, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

IP(2)(d) and (5)(d) amended, (HB 18-1364), ch. 351, p. 2084, § 11, effective July 1; (1)(i.5), (1)(i.7), (3)(a)(II.5) and (5)(h)(I.5) added and (3)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(III) amended, (HB 18-1285), ch. 265, p. 1628, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(1)(i) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1733, § 260, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

IP(2)(d) and (5)(d) amended, (HB 20-1392), ch. 132, p. 576, § 6, effective June 26.

42-3-205. Substitute plates - waiting period for reissuance of identical combination of numbers and letters.

If a number or personalized license plate issued under this article becomes lost, stolen, mutilated, or illegible, the person who is entitled thereto shall immediately apply for a substitute. Such application shall include evidence satisfactory to the department that such plate is lost, stolen, mutilated, or illegible and payment of the required fees. If the plate to be replaced is in the possession of the applicant, the plate shall be surrendered to the department along with the application.

If an application made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is accompanied by the personalized plate to be replaced, the department shall reissue a substitute plate bearing the identical sequential combination of letters and numbers that appears on the original plate.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1112, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-129 as it existed prior to 2005.

42-3-206. Remanufacture of certain license plates.

Persons who have been approved to be issued a license plate before July 1, 2003, pursuant to this section as it existed on July 1, 2003, shall be issued such plate, shall be authorized to continue using such plate, and shall not be required to pay additional fees beyond the existing taxes and fees imposed for motor vehicle registration. Such issuance of license plates that contain only two alphabetic figures and up to four numeric figures shall be issued as personalized license plates pursuant to section 42-3-211, which are a flat-style license plate. If the same alphanumeric combination is issued to multiple vehicles, the department shall compare the last four numbers of the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicles to which such plates are issued and issue such alphanumeric combination only to the vehicle with the lowest last four numbers.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1112, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-113.5 as it existed prior to 2005.